Rhode Island, session 2026, SB2741.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 16-16 of the General Laws entitled "Teachers’ Retirement [See Title
16 Chapter 97 — The Rhode Island Board of Education Act]" is hereby amended by adding thereto
the following section:
16-16-44. Member employment after retirement.
(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, any retired member of the
employees’ retirement system of Rhode Island, under titles 16, 36, or 45, may be employed in a
full-time or part-time position, within the employees’ retirement system of Rhode Island, without
any forfeiture of or reduction in, their retirement benefits and allowances the member is receiving,
or may receive, provided the retired member:
(i) Resides in Rhode Island for two hundred seventy (270) days in a calendar year; and
(ii) Has an annual gross income from all sources that is less than fifty-five thousand dollars
($55,000).
(b) Notice of the reemployment shall be sent monthly to the state retirement board by the
employer and by the retired member.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC005701
========